Utah statutes.
76-5-103.5.   Aggravated assault by prisoner.
Any prisoner who commits aggravated assault not amounting to a violation of
Section 76-3-203.6 is guilty of:
(1)  a second degree felony if no serious bodily injury was intentionally
caused; or
(2)  a first degree felony if serious bodily injury was intentionally caused.
